test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nouns2-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
    põlv+N+Sg+Com: põlvega
    põlv+N+Sg+Ela: põlvest
    põlv+N+Sg+Ess: põlvena
    põlv+N+Sg+Gen: põlve
    põlv+N+Sg+Ill: põlve
    põlv+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: põlvesse
    põlv+N+Sg+Ine: põlves
    põlv+N+Sg+Nom: põlv
    põlv+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Rare: põli
    põlv+N+Sg+Par: põlve
    põlv+N+Sg+Tra: põlveks
    põlv+N+Sg+Trm: põlveni
    päike+N+Pl+Abe: päikesteta
    päike+N+Pl+Abe+Use/Rare: päikseteta
    päike+N+Pl+Abl: päikestelt
    päike+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: [päikeseilt, päikesilt, päikseilt, päiksetelt]
    päike+N+Pl+Ade: päikestel
    päike+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: [päikeseil, päikesil, päikseil, päiksetel]
    päike+N+Pl+All: päikestele
    päike+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: [päikeseile, päikesile, päikseile, päiksetele]
    päike+N+Pl+Com: päikestega
    päike+N+Pl+Com+Use/Rare: päiksetega
    päike+N+Pl+Ela: päikestest
    päike+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: [päikeseist, päikesist, päikseist, päiksetest]
    päike+N+Pl+Ess: päikestena
    päike+N+Pl+Ess+Use/Rare: päiksetena
    päike+N+Pl+Gen: päikeste
    päike+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare: päiksete
    päike+N+Pl+Ill: päikestesse
    päike+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: [päikeseisse, päikesisse, päikseisse, päiksetesse]
    päike+N+Pl+Ine: päikestes
    päike+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: [päikeseis, päikesis, päikseis, päiksetes]
    päike+N+Pl+Nom: päikesed
    päike+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Rare: päiksed
    päike+N+Pl+Par: päikeseid
    päike+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: [päikesi, päikseid]
    päike+N+Pl+Tra: päikesteks
    päike+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: [päikeseiks, päikesiks, päikseiks, päikseteks]
    päike+N+Pl+Trm: päikesteni
    päike+N+Pl+Trm+Use/Rare: päikseteni
    päike+N+Sg+Abe: päikeseta
    päike+N+Sg+Abe+Use/Rare: päikseta
    päike+N+Sg+Abl: päikeselt
    päike+N+Sg+Abl+Use/Rare: päikselt
    päike+N+Sg+Ade: päikesel
    päike+N+Sg+Ade+Use/Rare: päiksel
    päike+N+Sg+All: päikesele
    päike+N+Sg+All+Use/Rare: päiksele
    päike+N+Sg+Com: päikesega
    päike+N+Sg+Com+Use/Rare: päiksega
    päike+N+Sg+Ela: päikesest
    päike+N+Sg+Ela+Use/Rare: päiksest
    päike+N+Sg+Ess: päikesena
    päike+N+Sg+Ess+Use/Rare: päiksena
    päike+N+Sg+Gen: päikese
    päike+N+Sg+Gen+Use/Rare: päikse
    päike+N+Sg+Ill: päikesesse
    päike+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: [päikesse, päiksesse]
    päike+N+Sg+Ine: päikeses
    päike+N+Sg+Ine+Use/Rare: päikses
    päike+N+Sg+Nom: päike
    päike+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Rare: päikene
    päike+N+Sg+Par: päikest
    päike+N+Sg+Par+Use/Rare: päikset
    päike+N+Sg+Tra: päikeseks
    päike+N+Sg+Tra+Use/Rare: päikseks
    päike+N+Sg+Trm: päikeseni
    päike+N+Sg+Trm+Use/Rare: päikseni
    pöial+N+Pl+Abe: pöialdeta
    pöial+N+Pl+Abe+Use/NotNorm: pöidlateta
    pöial+N+Pl+Abl: pöialdelt
    pöial+N+Pl+Abl+Use/NotNorm: pöidlatelt
    pöial+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: pöidlailt
    pöial+N+Pl+Ade: pöialdel
    pöial+N+Pl+Ade+Use/NotNorm: pöidlatel
    pöial+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: pöidlail
    pöial+N+Pl+All: pöialdele
    pöial+N+Pl+All+Use/NotNorm: pöidlatele
    pöial+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: pöidlaile
    pöial+N+Pl+Com: pöialdega
    pöial+N+Pl+Com+Use/NotNorm: pöidlatega
    pöial+N+Pl+Ela: pöialdest
    pöial+N+Pl+Ela+Use/NotNorm: pöidlatest
    pöial+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: pöidlaist
    pöial+N+Pl+Ess: pöialdena
    pöial+N+Pl+Ess+Use/NotNorm: pöidlatena
    pöial+N+Pl+Gen: pöialde
    pöial+N+Pl+Gen+Use/NotNorm: pöidlate
    pöial+N+Pl+Ill: pöialdesse
    pöial+N+Pl+Ill+Use/NotNorm: pöidlatesse
    pöial+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: pöidlaisse
    pöial+N+Pl+Ine: pöialdes
    pöial+N+Pl+Ine+Use/NotNorm: pöidlates
    pöial+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: pöidlais
    pöial+N+Pl+Nom: pöidlad
    pöial+N+Pl+Par: pöidlaid
    pöial+N+Pl+Tra: pöialdeks
    pöial+N+Pl+Tra+Use/NotNorm: pöidlateks
    pöial+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: pöidlaiks
    pöial+N+Pl+Trm: pöialdeni
    pöial+N+Pl+Trm+Use/NotNorm: pöidlateni
    pöial+N+Sg+Abe: pöidlata
    pöial+N+Sg+Abl: pöidlalt
    pöial+N+Sg+Ade: pöidlal
    pöial+N+Sg+All: pöidlale
    pöial+N+Sg+Com: pöidlaga
    pöial+N+Sg+Ela: pöidlast
    pöial+N+Sg+Ess: pöidlana
    pöial+N+Sg+Gen: pöidla
    pöial+N+Sg+Ill: pöidlasse
    pöial+N+Sg+Ine: pöidlas
    pöial+N+Sg+Nom: pöial
    pöial+N+Sg+Par: pöialt
    pöial+N+Sg+Tra: pöidlaks
    pöial+N+Sg+Trm: pöidlani
    rake+N+Pl+Abe: raketeta
    rake+N+Pl+Abl: raketelt
    rake+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: rakkeilt
    rake+N+Pl+Ade: raketel
    rake+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: rakkeil
    rake+N+Pl+All: raketele
    rake+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: rakkeile
    rake+N+Pl+Com: raketega
    rake+N+Pl+Ela: raketest
    rake+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: rakkeist
    rake+N+Pl+Ess: raketena
    rake+N+Pl+Gen: rakete
    rake+N+Pl+Ill: raketesse
    rake+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: rakkeisse
    rake+N+Pl+Ine: raketes
    rake+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: rakkeis
    rake+N+Pl+Nom: rakked
    rake+N+Pl+Par: rakkeid
    rake+N+Pl+Tra: raketeks
    rake+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: rakkeiks
    rake+N+Pl+Trm: raketeni
    rake+N+Sg+Abe: rakketa
    rake+N+Sg+Abl: rakkelt
    rake+N+Sg+Ade: rakkel
    rake+N+Sg+All: rakkele
    rake+N+Sg+Com: rakkega
    rake+N+Sg+Ela: rakkest
    rake+N+Sg+Ess: rakkena
    rake+N+Sg+Gen: rakke
    rake+N+Sg+Ill: rakke
    rake+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: rakkesse
    rake+N+Sg+Ine: rakkes
    rake+N+Sg+Nom: rake
    rake+N+Sg+Par: raket
    rake+N+Sg+Tra: rakkeks
    rake+N+Sg+Trm: rakkeni
    ranne+N+Pl+Abe: randmeteta
    ranne+N+Pl+Abl: randmetelt
    ranne+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: randmeilt
    ranne+N+Pl+Ade: randmetel
    ranne+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: randmeil
    ranne+N+Pl+All: randmetele
    ranne+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: randmeile
    ranne+N+Pl+Com: randmetega
    ranne+N+Pl+Ela: randmetest
    ranne+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: randmeist
    ranne+N+Pl+Ess: randmetena
    ranne+N+Pl+Gen: randmete
    ranne+N+Pl+Ill: randmetesse
    ranne+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: randmeisse
    ranne+N+Pl+Ine: randmetes
    ranne+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: randmeis
    ranne+N+Pl+Nom: randmed
    ranne+N+Pl+Par: randmeid
    ranne+N+Pl+Tra: randmeteks
    ranne+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: randmeiks
    ranne+N+Pl+Trm: randmeteni
    ranne+N+Sg+Abe: randmeta
    ranne+N+Sg+Abl: randmelt
    ranne+N+Sg+Ade: randmel
    ranne+N+Sg+All: randmele
    ranne+N+Sg+Com: randmega
    ranne+N+Sg+Ela: randmest
    ranne+N+Sg+Ess: randmena
    ranne+N+Sg+Gen: randme
    ranne+N+Sg+Ill: randmesse
    ranne+N+Sg+Ine: randmes
    ranne+N+Sg+Nom: ranne
    ranne+N+Sg+Par: rannet
    ranne+N+Sg+Tra: randmeks
    ranne+N+Sg+Trm: randmeni
    rehi+N+Pl+Abe: rehtedeta
    rehi+N+Pl+Abl: rehtedelt
    rehi+N+Pl+Ade: rehtedel
    rehi+N+Pl+All: rehtedele
    rehi+N+Pl+Com: rehtedega
    rehi+N+Pl+Ela: rehtedest
    rehi+N+Pl+Ess: rehtedena
    rehi+N+Pl+Gen: rehtede
    rehi+N+Pl+Ill: rehtedesse
    rehi+N+Pl+Ine: rehtedes
    rehi+N+Pl+Nom: rehed
    rehi+N+Pl+Par: rehtesid
    rehi+N+Pl+Tra: rehtedeks
    rehi+N+Pl+Trm: rehtedeni
    rehi+N+Sg+Abe: reheta
    rehi+N+Sg+Abl: rehelt
    rehi+N+Sg+Ade: rehel
    rehi+N+Sg+All: rehele
    rehi+N+Sg+Com: rehega
    rehi+N+Sg+Ela: rehest
    rehi+N+Sg+Ess: rehena
    rehi+N+Sg+Gen: rehe
    rehi+N+Sg+Ill: rehte
    rehi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: rehesse
    rehi+N+Sg+Ine: rehes
    rehi+N+Sg+Nom: rehi
    rehi+N+Sg+Par: rehte
    rehi+N+Sg+Par+Use/Rare: reht
    rehi+N+Sg+Tra: reheks
    rehi+N+Sg+Trm: reheni
    rohi+N+Pl+Abe: rohtudeta
    rohi+N+Pl+Abl: rohtudelt
    rohi+N+Pl+Ade: rohtudel
    rohi+N+Pl+All: rohtudele
    rohi+N+Pl+Com: rohtudega
    rohi+N+Pl+Ela: rohtudest
    rohi+N+Pl+Ess: rohtudena
    rohi+N+Pl+Gen: rohtude
    rohi+N+Pl+Ill: rohtudesse
    rohi+N+Pl+Ine: rohtudes
    rohi+N+Pl+Nom: rohud
    rohi+N+Pl+Par: rohtusid
    rohi+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: rohte
    rohi+N+Pl+Tra: rohtudeks
    rohi+N+Pl+Trm: rohtudeni
    rohi+N+Sg+Abe: rohuta
    rohi+N+Sg+Abl: rohult
    rohi+N+Sg+Ade: rohul
    rohi+N+Sg+All: rohule
    rohi+N+Sg+Com: rohuga
    rohi+N+Sg+Ela: rohust
    rohi+N+Sg+Ess: rohuna
    rohi+N+Sg+Gen: rohu
    rohi+N+Sg+Ill: rohtu
    rohi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: rohusse
    rohi+N+Sg+Ine: rohus
    rohi+N+Sg+Nom: rohi
    rohi+N+Sg+Par: rohtu
    rohi+N+Sg+Tra: rohuks
    rohi+N+Sg+Trm: rohuni
    rukis+N+Pl+Abe: rukisteta
    rukis+N+Pl+Abl: rukistelt
    rukis+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: rukkeilt
    rukis+N+Pl+Ade: rukistel
    rukis+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: rukkeil
    rukis+N+Pl+All: rukistele
    rukis+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: rukkeile
    rukis+N+Pl+Com: rukistega
    rukis+N+Pl+Ela: rukistest
    rukis+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: rukkeist
    rukis+N+Pl+Ess: rukistena
    rukis+N+Pl+Gen: rukiste
    rukis+N+Pl+Ill: rukistesse
    rukis+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: rukkeisse
    rukis+N+Pl+Ine: rukistes
    rukis+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: rukkeis
    rukis+N+Pl+Nom: rukkid
    rukis+N+Pl+Par: rukkeid
    rukis+N+Pl+Tra: rukisteks
    rukis+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: rukkeiks
    rukis+N+Pl+Trm: rukisteni
    rukis+N+Sg+Abe: rukkita
    rukis+N+Sg+Abl: rukkilt
    rukis+N+Sg+Ade: rukkil
    rukis+N+Sg+All: rukkile
    rukis+N+Sg+Com: rukkiga
    rukis+N+Sg+Ela: rukkist
    rukis+N+Sg+Ess: rukkina
    rukis+N+Sg+Gen: rukki
    rukis+N+Sg+Ill: rukkisse
    rukis+N+Sg+Ine: rukkis
    rukis+N+Sg+Nom: rukis
    rukis+N+Sg+Par: rukist
    rukis+N+Sg+Tra: rukkiks
    rukis+N+Sg+Trm: rukkini
    saag+N+Pl+Abe: saagideta
    saag+N+Pl+Abl: saagidelt
    saag+N+Pl+Ade: saagidel
    saag+N+Pl+All: saagidele
    saag+N+Pl+Com: saagidega
    saag+N+Pl+Ela: saagidest
    saag+N+Pl+Ess: saagidena
    saag+N+Pl+Gen: saagide
    saag+N+Pl+Ill: saagidesse
    saag+N+Pl+Ine: saagides
    saag+N+Pl+Nom: saed
    saag+N+Pl+Par: saage
    saag+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: saagisid
    saag+N+Pl+Tra: saagideks
    saag+N+Pl+Trm: saagideni
    saag+N+Sg+Abe: saeta
    saag+N+Sg+Abl: saelt
    saag+N+Sg+Ade: sael
    saag+N+Sg+All: saele
    saag+N+Sg+Com: saega
    saag+N+Sg+Ela: saest
    saag+N+Sg+Ess: saena
    saag+N+Sg+Gen: sae
    saag+N+Sg+Ill: saagi
    saag+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: saesse
    saag+N+Sg+Ine: saes
    saag+N+Sg+Nom: saag
    saag+N+Sg+Par: saagi
    saag+N+Sg+Tra: saeks
    saag+N+Sg+Trm: saeni
    saba+N+Pl+Abe: sabadeta
    saba+N+Pl+Abl: sabadelt
    saba+N+Pl+Ade: sabadel
    saba+N+Pl+All: sabadele
    saba+N+Pl+Com: sabadega
    saba+N+Pl+Ela: sabadest
    saba+N+Pl+Ess: sabadena
    saba+N+Pl+Gen: sabade
    saba+N+Pl+Ill: sabadesse
    saba+N+Pl+Ine: sabades
    saba+N+Pl+Nom: sabad
    saba+N+Pl+Par: sabasid
    saba+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: sabu
    saba+N+Pl+Tra: sabadeks
    saba+N+Pl+Trm: sabadeni
    saba+N+Sg+Abe: sabata
    saba+N+Sg+Abl: sabalt
    saba+N+Sg+Ade: sabal
    saba+N+Sg+All: sabale
    saba+N+Sg+Com: sabaga
    saba+N+Sg+Ela: sabast
    saba+N+Sg+Ess: sabana
    saba+N+Sg+Gen: saba
    saba+N+Sg+Ill: sappa
    saba+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: sabasse
    saba+N+Sg+Ine: sabas
    saba+N+Sg+Nom: saba
    saba+N+Sg+Par: saba
    saba+N+Sg+Tra: sabaks
    saba+N+Sg+Trm: sabani
    seade+N+Pl+Abe: seadmeteta
    seade+N+Pl+Abl: seadmetelt
    seade+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: seadmeilt
    seade+N+Pl+Ade: seadmetel
    seade+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: seadmeil
    seade+N+Pl+All: seadmetele
    seade+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: seadmeile
    seade+N+Pl+Com: seadmetega
    seade+N+Pl+Ela: seadmetest
    seade+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: seadmeist
    seade+N+Pl+Ess: seadmetena
    seade+N+Pl+Gen: seadmete
    seade+N+Pl+Ill: seadmetesse
    seade+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: seadmeisse
    seade+N+Pl+Ine: seadmetes
    seade+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: seadmeis
    seade+N+Pl+Nom: seadmed
    seade+N+Pl+Par: seadmeid
    seade+N+Pl+Tra: seadmeteks
    seade+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: seadmeiks
    seade+N+Pl+Trm: seadmeteni
    seade+N+Sg+Abe: seadmeta
    seade+N+Sg+Abl: seadmelt
    seade+N+Sg+Ade: seadmel
    seade+N+Sg+All: seadmele
    seade+N+Sg+Com: seadmega
    seade+N+Sg+Ela: seadmest
    seade+N+Sg+Ess: seadmena
    seade+N+Sg+Gen: seadme
    seade+N+Sg+Ill: seadmesse
    seade+N+Sg+Ine: seadmes
    seade+N+Sg+Nom: seade
    seade+N+Sg+Par: seadet
    seade+N+Sg+Tra: seadmeks
    seade+N+Sg+Trm: seadmeni
    seminar+N+Pl+Abe: seminarideta
    seminar+N+Pl+Abl: seminaridelt
    seminar+N+Pl+Ade: seminaridel
    seminar+N+Pl+All: seminaridele
    seminar+N+Pl+Com: seminaridega
    seminar+N+Pl+Ela: seminaridest
    seminar+N+Pl+Ess: seminaridena
    seminar+N+Pl+Gen: seminaride
    seminar+N+Pl+Ill: seminaridesse
